New York, session 2025-2026, S4767.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 840 of the execu- 2 tive law, as added by section 4 of part JJ of chapter 57 of the laws of 3 2018, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) Develop, maintain and disseminate, in consultation with the 5 commissioner of the office for people with developmental disabilities, 6 written policies and procedures consistent with section 13.43 of the 7 mental hygiene law, regarding the handling of emergency situations 8 involving individuals with autism spectrum disorder and other develop- 9 mental disabilities. Such policies and procedures shall make provisions 10 for the education and training of new and veteran police officers on the 11 handling of emergency situations involving individuals with autism spec- 12 trum disorder and other developmental disabilities, including but not 13 limited to training on the appropriate use of force on such individuals, 14 as well as training on appropriate techniques for deescalating encount- 15 ers with such individuals that is consistent with such individual's 16 safety; and 17 § 2. Subdivision (b) of section 13.43 of the mental hygiene law, as 18 added by section 1 of part JJ of chapter 57 of the laws of 2018, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 (b) Such training shall address appropriate response techniques for 21 dealing with both adults and minors with autism spectrum disorder and 22 other developmental disabilities, including but not limited to training 23 on the appropriate use of force on such individuals, as well as training 24 on appropriate techniques for deescalating encounters with such individ- 25 uals that is consistent with such individual's safety. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08887-01-5